Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1049
School of esthetics, defined.

School of esthetics means a fixed structure or part thereof licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to serve as the site for teaching the practices of esthetics to esthetics students.

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-365.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 311.